Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Subchapter 2. Aid for Special Education and Support Services
§ 2973. Section 2973 effective July 1, 2023; see also section 2973 effective until July 1, 2023 set out above. Independent school tuition rates.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, an approved independent school that accepts public tuition shall enroll any student with an individualized education program who requires special education services and who is placed in the approved independent school as an appropriate placement and least restrictive environment for the student by the student’s individualized education program team or by the local education agency (LEA); provided, however, that this requirement shall not apply to an independent school that limits enrollment to students who are on an individualized education program or a plan under Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. § 794, and who are enrolled pursuant to a written agreement between the LEA and the school.
(a) (1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, an approved independent school that accepts public tuition shall enroll any student with an individualized education program who requires special education services and who is placed in the approved independent school as an appropriate placement and least restrictive environment for the student by the student’s individualized education program team or by the local education agency (LEA); provided, however, that this requirement shall not apply to an independent school that limits enrollment to students who are on an individualized education program or a plan under Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. § 794, and who are enrolled pursuant to a written agreement between the LEA and the school.

In placing a student with an independent school under subdivision (1) of this subsection, the student’s individualized education program team and the LEA shall comply with all applicable federal and State requirements.

An approved independent school is not required to demonstrate that it has the resources to serve every category of special education as defined under State Board of Education rules in order to be approved or retain its approval to receive public funding for general tuition.

The terms “special education services,” “LEA,” and “individualized education program” or “IEP” as used in this section shall have the same meanings as defined by State Board rules.

The Secretary of Education shall establish minimum standards of services for students receiving special education services in independent schools in Vermont and may advise independent schools as to the need for certain special education services in Vermont.
(b) (1) The Secretary of Education shall establish minimum standards of services for students receiving special education services in independent schools in Vermont and may advise independent schools as to the need for certain special education services in Vermont.

The Secretary of Education shall set, after consultation with independent schools in Vermont, and based on the level of services provided by the schools, the maximum rates to be paid by the Agency and supervisory unions or school districts for tuition, room, and board for residential placement of students who require special education services. The amount charged by an independent school for tuition shall reflect the school’s actual or anticipated costs of providing special education services to the student and shall not exceed the maximum rates set by the Secretary, provided that the Secretary may permit charges in excess of these maximum rates where the Secretary deems warranted.
(2) (A) The Secretary of Education shall set, after consultation with independent schools in Vermont, and based on the level of services provided by the schools, the maximum rates to be paid by the Agency and supervisory unions or school districts for tuition, room, and board for residential placement of students who require special education services. The amount charged by an independent school for tuition shall reflect the school’s actual or anticipated costs of providing special education services to the student and shall not exceed the maximum rates set by the Secretary, provided that the Secretary may permit charges in excess of these maximum rates where the Secretary deems warranted.

An approved independent school that enrolls a student under subdivision (a)(1) of this section may bill the responsible LEA for excess special education costs incurred by the independent school in providing special education services beyond those covered by general tuition. Reimbursement of these excess special education costs shall be based on the direct-cost rates approved by the Secretary for services actually provided to the student consistent with the Agency of Education Technical Manual for special education cost accounting. The Agency of Education shall publish specific elements that must be included as part of an independent school’s invoice for excess special education costs, and these elements shall be included in the written agreement required under subdivision (c)(2) of this section.
(B) (i) An approved independent school that enrolls a student under subdivision (a)(1) of this section may bill the responsible LEA for excess special education costs incurred by the independent school in providing special education services beyond those covered by general tuition. Reimbursement of these excess special education costs shall be based on the direct-cost rates approved by the Secretary for services actually provided to the student consistent with the Agency of Education Technical Manual for special education cost accounting. The Agency of Education shall publish specific elements that must be included as part of an independent school’s invoice for excess special education costs, and these elements shall be included in the written agreement required under subdivision (c)(2) of this section.

In establishing the direct-cost rates for reimbursement under this subdivision (B), the Secretary shall apply the principle of treating an approved independent school and a public school with parity in the amount of federal, State, and local contributions to cover the costs of providing special education services.

An approved independent school that enrolls a student under subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall provide such documentation to the Secretary as the Secretary deems necessary in order to ensure that amounts payable under this subdivision (B) to the school are reasonable in relation to the special education services provided by the school. The Secretary may withhold, or direct an LEA to withhold, payment under this subdivision pending the Secretary’s receipt of required documentation under this subdivision, or may withhold, or direct an LEA to withhold, an amount determined by the Secretary as not reasonable in relation to the special education services provided by the school.

The Secretary shall set, after consultation with independent schools in Vermont, the maximum tuition rates to be paid by the Agency and supervisory unions or school districts to independent schools that limit enrollment to students who are on an IEP or a plan under Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. § 794, and who are enrolled pursuant to a written agreement between the LEA and the school. The maximum tuition rates shall be based on the level of services provided by the school.
(C) (i) The Secretary shall set, after consultation with independent schools in Vermont, the maximum tuition rates to be paid by the Agency and supervisory unions or school districts to independent schools that limit enrollment to students who are on an IEP or a plan under Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. § 794, and who are enrolled pursuant to a written agreement between the LEA and the school. The maximum tuition rates shall be based on the level of services provided by the school.

The tuition rates established by the Secretary under this subdivision (C) shall be no more than the costs that are reasonably related to the level of services provided by the school and shall be set forth on a form prescribed for that purpose by the Secretary of Education. The Secretary shall determine the relationship between costs and the level of services by using generally accepted accounting principles, such as those set forth in the Handbook (II) for Financial Accounting of Vermont School Systems.

After the Secretary approves a tuition rate for an independent school under this subdivision (C), the school shall not exceed that tuition rate until such time as a new tuition rate is approved by the Secretary.

In order to be approved as an independent school eligible to receive State funding under subdivision (a)(1) of this section, the school shall demonstrate the ability to serve students with disabilities by:
(c) (1) In order to be approved as an independent school eligible to receive State funding under subdivision (a)(1) of this section, the school shall demonstrate the ability to serve students with disabilities by:

demonstrating an understanding of special education requirements, including the:

provision of a free and appropriate public education in accordance with federal and State law;

provision of education in the least restrictive environment in accordance with federal and State law;

characteristics and educational needs associated with any of the categories of disability or suspected disability under federal and State law; and

procedural safeguards and parental rights, including discipline procedures, specified in federal and State law;

committing to implementing the IEP of an enrolled student with special education needs, providing the required services, and appropriately documenting the services and the student’s progress;

employing or contracting with staff who have the required licensure to provide special education services;

agreeing to communicate with the responsible LEA concerning:

the development of, and any changes to, the IEP;

services provided under the IEP and recommendations for a change in the services provided;

the student’s progress;

the maintenance of the student’s enrollment in the independent school; and

the identification of students with suspected disabilities; and

committing to participate in dispute resolution as provided under federal and State law.

An approved independent school that enrolls a student requiring special education services who is placed with the school under subdivision (a)(1) of this section:

shall enter into a written agreement with the LEA committing to the requirements under subdivision (1) of this subsection (c); and

shall ensure that qualified school personnel attend planning meetings and IEP meetings for the student.

If a student is placed with an approved independent school under subsection (a) of this section and either the LEA and the school each certifies, or the hearing officer under subdivision (3) of this subsection certifies, to the Secretary of Education that the school is unable to provide required IEP services due to its inability to retain qualified staff, then the LEA shall make another placement that satisfies the federal requirements to provide the student with a free and appropriate public education in the least restrictive environment.
(d) (1) If a student is placed with an approved independent school under subsection (a) of this section and either the LEA and the school each certifies, or the hearing officer under subdivision (3) of this subsection certifies, to the Secretary of Education that the school is unable to provide required IEP services due to its inability to retain qualified staff, then the LEA shall make another placement that satisfies the federal requirements to provide the student with a free and appropriate public education in the least restrictive environment.

If the conditions in subdivision (1) of this subsection are satisfied:

the approved independent school shall not be subject to any disciplinary action or the revocation of its approved status by the State Board of Education due to its failure to enroll the student; and

no private right of action shall be created on the part of the student or his or her family members, or any other private party, to:

require the LEA to place the student with the approved independent school or the school to enroll the student; or

hold the LEA or the approved independent school responsible for monetary damages due to the failure of the school to enroll the student or the necessity for the LEA to make an alternative placement.

If the LEA and approved independent school do not agree on whether the school is unable to retain qualified staff under subdivision (1) of this subsection, then the LEA and the school shall jointly contract with a hearing officer to conduct a hearing with the parties and make a determination, which shall be final. The cost for the hearing officer shall be split evenly between the two parties.

Neither a school district nor any State agency shall pay rates for tuition, room, and board for students receiving special education in independent schools outside Vermont that are in excess of allowable costs approved by the authorized body in the state in which the independent school is located, except in exceptional circumstances or for a child who needs exceptional services, as approved by the Secretary.

The State Board is authorized to enter into interstate compacts with other states to regulate rates for tuition, room, and board for students receiving special education in independent schools.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 230

(Adj. Sess.), § 28;

1991, No. 24

, § 11;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 212, eff. Feb. 14, 2014;

2017, No. 173

(Adj. Sess.), § 21, eff. July 1, 2023.

§ 2973a.
Special education; best practices; policy.

It is the public policy of the State that integrated special education services are recognized as an essential responsibility of the educational system that benefits all students and contribute to the good of the State. This section and section 2974 of this title recognize that best practices in delivery of such services promote this policy.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 82

, § 26.

§ 2974. Section 2974 effective until July 1, 2022; see also section 2974 effective July 1, 2022 set out below. Special education program; fiscal review.

Annually, the Secretary shall report to the State Board regarding:

special education expenditures by supervisory unions;

the rate of growth or decrease in special education costs, including the identity of high- and low-spending supervisory unions;

results for special education students;

the availability of special education staff;

the consistency of special education program implementation statewide;

the status of the education support systems in supervisory unions; and

a statewide summary of the special education student count, including:

the percentage of the total average daily membership represented by special education students statewide and by supervisory union;

the percentage of special education students by disability category; and

the percentage of special education students served by public schools within the supervisory union, by day placement, and by residential placement.

The Secretary’s report shall include the following data for both high- and low-spending supervisory unions:

each supervisory union’s special education staff-to-child count ratios as compared to the State average, including a breakdown of ratios by staffing categories;

each supervisory union’s percentage of students in day programs and residential placements as compared to the State average of students in those placements and information about the categories of disabilities for the students in such placements;

whether the supervisory union was in compliance with section 2901 of this title;

any unusual community characteristics in each supervisory union relevant to special education placements;

a review of high- and low-spending supervisory unions’ special education student count patterns over time;

a review of the supervisory union’s compliance with federal and State requirements to provide a free, appropriate public education to eligible students; and

any other factors affecting its spending.

The Secretary shall review low-spending supervisory unions to determine the reasons for their spending patterns and whether those supervisory unions used cost-effective strategies appropriate to replicate in other supervisory unions.

For the purposes of this section, a “high-spending supervisory union” is a supervisory union that, in the previous school year, spent at least 20 percent more than the statewide average of special education eligible costs per average daily membership. Also for the purposes of this section, a “low-spending supervisory union” is a supervisory union that, in the previous school year, spent no more than 80 percent of the statewide average of special education eligible costs per average daily membership.

The Secretary and Agency staff shall assist the high-spending supervisory unions, which have been identified in subsection (a) of this section and have not presented an explanation for their spending that is satisfactory to the Secretary, to identify reasonable alternatives and to develop a remediation plan. Development of the remediation plan shall include an on-site review. The supervisory union shall have two years to make progress on the remediation plan. At the conclusion of the two years or earlier, the supervisory union shall report its progress on the remediation plan.

Within 30 days of receipt of the supervisory union’s report of progress, the Secretary shall notify the supervisory union that its progress is either satisfactory or not satisfactory.

If the supervisory union fails to make satisfactory progress, the Secretary shall notify the supervisory union that, in the ensuing school year, the Secretary shall withhold 10 percent of the supervisory union’s special education expenditures reimbursement pending satisfactory compliance with the plan.

If the supervisory union fails to make satisfactory progress after the first year of withholding, 10 percent shall be withheld in each subsequent year pending satisfactory compliance with the plan; provided, however, before funds are withheld in any year under this subdivision (f)(2), the supervisory union shall explain to the State Board either the reasons the supervisory union believes it made satisfactory progress on the remediation plan or the reasons it failed to do so. The State Board’s decision whether to withhold funds under this subdivision shall be final.

If the supervisory union makes satisfactory progress under any subdivision of this subsection, the Secretary shall release to the supervisory union any special education expenditures reimbursement withheld for the prior fiscal year only.

Within 10 days after receiving the Secretary’s notice under subdivision (f)(1) of this section, the supervisory union may challenge the Secretary’s decision by filing a written objection to the State Board outlining the reasons the supervisory union believes it made satisfactory progress on the remediation plan. The Secretary may file a written response within 10 days after the supervisory union’s objection is filed. The State Board may give the supervisory union and the Secretary an opportunity to be heard. The State Board’s decision shall be final. The State shall withhold no portion of the supervisory union’s reimbursement before the State Board issues its decision under this subsection.

Nothing in this section shall prevent a supervisory union from seeking and receiving the technical assistance of Agency staff to reduce its special education spending.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 60

, § 31, eff. June 26, 1997; amended

1997, No. 71

(Adj. Sess.), § 115, eff. March 11, 1998;

1999, No. 117

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

2007, No. 82

, § 10;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 213, eff. Feb. 14, 2014;

2015, No. 11

, § 14;

2015, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. July 1, 2017;

2017, No. 74

, § 24;

2017, No. 173

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. July 1, 2022.

§ 2974. Section 2974 effective July 1, 2022; see also section 2974 effective until July 1, 2022 set out above. Special education program; fiscal review.

Annually, the Secretary shall report to the State Board regarding:

the total amount of census grants made to supervisory unions under section 2961 of this title;

the total amount of extraordinary special education reimbursement made to supervisory unions under section 2962 of this title;

results for special education students;

the availability of special education staff;

the consistency of special education program implementation statewide;

the status of tiered systems of supports in supervisory unions; and

a statewide summary of the special education student count, including:

the percentage of the total average daily membership represented by special education students statewide and by supervisory union;

the percentage of special education students by disability category; and

the percentage of special education students served by public schools within the supervisory union, by day placement, and by residential placement.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 60

, § 31, eff. June 26, 1997; amended

1997, No. 71

(Adj. Sess.), § 115, eff. March 11, 1998;

1999, No. 117

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

2007, No. 82

, § 10;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 213, eff. Feb. 14, 2014;

2015, No. 11

, § 14;

2015, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. July 1, 2017;

2017, No. 74

, § 24;

2017, No. 173

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. July 1, 2022.

§ 2975. Section 2975 effective until July 1, 2022; see also section 2975 effective July 1, 2022 set out below. Unusual special education costs; financial assistance.

The Secretary may use up to two percent of the funds appropriated for special education expenditures, as that term is defined in subsection 2967(b) of this title, to directly assist supervisory unions with special education expenditures of an unusual or unexpected nature. These funds shall not be used for exceptional circumstances that are funded under section 2963a of this title. The Secretary’s decision regarding a supervisory union’s eligibility for and amount of assistance shall be final.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 66

, § 13; amended

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 214, eff. Feb. 14, 2014;

2015, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. July 1, 2017;

2017, No. 173

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. July 1, 2021;

2019, No. 112

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. July 1, 2022.

§ 2975. Section 2975 effective July 1, 2022; see also section 2975 effective until July 1, 2022 set out above. Unusual special education costs; financial assistance.

The Secretary may use funds for allowable special education expenditures, as defined in State Board of Education rules, to directly assist supervisory unions with special education expenditures of an unusual or unexpected nature. These funds shall be appropriated in the amount of two percent times the census grant as defined in section 2961 of this title. The Secretary’s decision regarding a supervisory union’s eligibility for and amount of assistance shall be final.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 66

, § 13; amended

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 214, eff. Feb. 14, 2014;

2015, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. July 1, 2017;

2017, No. 173

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. July 1, 2021;

2019, No. 112

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. July 1, 2022.